Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.118.030

Duty of school districts—Notification.

Each school district shall notify students, parents, teachers, counselors, and principals about the Washington college bound scholarship program through existing channels. Notification methods may include, but are not limited to, regular school district and building communications, online scholarship bulletins and announcements, notices posted on school walls and bulletin boards, information available in each counselor's office, and school or district scholarship information sessions.

[ 2007 c 405 s 4.]